Illinois, session 104th, HB3855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 17.12 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/17.12)7    Sec. 17.12. Lead service line replacement and 8notification.9    (a) The purpose of this Act is to: (1) require the owners 10and operators of community water supplies to develop, 11implement, and maintain a comprehensive water service line 12material inventory and a comprehensive lead service line 13replacement plan, provide notice to occupants of potentially 14affected buildings before any construction or repair work on 15water mains or lead service lines, and request access to 16potentially affected buildings before replacing lead service 17lines; and (2) prohibit partial lead service line 18replacements, except as authorized within this Section.19    (b) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 20        (1) There is no safe level of exposure to heavy metal 21    lead, as found by the United States Environmental 22    Protection Agency and the Centers for Disease Control and 23    Prevention.  HB3855- 2 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (2) Lead service lines can convey this harmful 2    substance to the drinking water supply.3        (3) According to the Illinois Environmental Protection 4    Agency's 2018 Service Line Material Inventory, the State 5    of Illinois is estimated to have over 680,000 lead-based 6    service lines still in operation.7        (4) The true number of lead service lines is not fully 8    known because Illinois lacks an adequate inventory of lead 9    service lines.10        (5) For the general health, safety, and welfare of its 11    residents, all lead service lines in Illinois should be 12    disconnected from the drinking water supply, and the 13    State's drinking water supply. 14    (c) In this Section:15    "Advisory Board" means the Lead Service Line Replacement 16Advisory Board created under subsection (x).17    "Community water supply" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18Section 3.145 of this Act.19    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.20    "Emergency repair" means any unscheduled water main, water 21service, or water valve repair or replacement that results 22from failure or accident.23    "Fund" means the Lead Service Line Replacement Fund 24created under subsection (bb).25    "Lead service line" means a service line made of lead or 26service line connected to a lead pigtail, lead gooseneck, or   HB3855- 3 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1other lead fitting.2    "Material inventory" means a water service line material 3inventory developed by a community water supply under this 4Act.5    "Non-community water supply" has the meaning ascribed to 6it in Section 3.145 of the Environmental Protection Act.7    "NSF/ANSI Standard" means a water treatment standard 8developed by NSF International.9    "Partial lead service line replacement" means replacement 10of only a portion of a lead service line.11    "Potentially affected building" means any building that is 12provided water service through a service line that is either a 13lead service line or a suspected lead service line.14    "Public water supply" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15Section 3.365 of this Act.16    "Service line" means the piping, tubing, and necessary 17appurtenances acting as a conduit from the water main or 18source of potable water supply to the building plumbing at the 19first shut-off valve or 18 inches inside the building, 20whichever is shorter.21    "Suspected lead service line" means a service line that a 22community water supply finds more likely than not to be made of 23lead after completing the requirements under paragraphs (2) 24through (5) of subsection (h).25    "Small system" means a community water supply that 26regularly serves water to 3,300 or fewer persons.   HB3855- 4 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    (d) An owner or operator of a community water supply 2shall: 3        (1) develop an initial material inventory by April 15, 4    2022 and electronically submit by April 15, 2023 an 5    updated material inventory electronically to the Agency; 6    and7        (2) deliver a complete material inventory to the 8    Agency no later than April 15, 2024, or such time as 9    required by federal law, whichever is sooner. The complete 10    inventory shall report the composition of all service 11    lines in the community water supply's distribution system. 12    (e) The Agency shall review and approve the final material 13inventory submitted to it under subsection (d).14    (f) If a community water supply does not submit a complete 15inventory to the Agency by April 15, 2024 under paragraph (2) 16of subsection (d), the community water supply may apply for an 17extension to the Agency no less than 3 months prior to the due 18date. The Agency shall develop criteria for granting material 19inventory extensions. When considering requests for extension, 20the Agency shall, at a minimum, consider: 21        (1) the number of service connections in a water 22    supply; and23        (2) the number of service lines of an unknown material 24    composition.25    (g) A material inventory prepared for a community water 26supply under subsection (d) shall identify:   HB3855- 5 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (1) the total number of service lines connected to the 2    community water supply's distribution system;3        (2) the materials of construction of each service line 4    connected to the community water supply's distribution 5    system;6        (3) the number of suspected lead service lines that 7    were newly identified in the material inventory for the 8    community water supply after the community water supply 9    last submitted a service line inventory to the Agency; and10        (4) the number of suspected or known lead service 11    lines that were replaced after the community water supply 12    last submitted a service line inventory to the Agency, and 13    the material of the service line that replaced each lead 14    service line. 15    When identifying the materials of construction under 16paragraph (2) of this subsection, the owner or operator of the 17community water supply shall to the best of the owner's or 18operator's ability identify the type of construction material 19used on the customer's side of the curb box, meter, or other 20line of demarcation and the community water supply's side of 21the curb box, meter, or other line of demarcation.22    (h) In completing a material inventory under subsection 23(d), the owner or operator of a community water supply shall: 24        (1) prioritize inspections of high-risk areas 25    identified by the community water supply and inspections 26    of high-risk facilities, such as preschools, day care   HB3855- 6 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    centers, day care homes, group day care homes, parks, 2    playgrounds, hospitals, and clinics, and confirm service 3    line materials in those areas and at those facilities;4        (2) review historical documentation, such as 5    construction logs or cards, as-built drawings, purchase 6    orders, and subdivision plans, to determine service line 7    material construction;8        (3) when conducting distribution system maintenance, 9    visually inspect service lines and document materials of 10    construction;11        (4) identify any time period when the service lines 12    being connected to its distribution system were primarily 13    lead service lines, if such a time period is known or 14    suspected; and15        (5) discuss service line repair and installation with 16    its employees, contractors, plumbers, other workers who 17    worked on service lines connected to its distribution 18    system, or all of the above.19    (i) The owner or operator of each community water supply 20shall maintain records of persons who refuse to grant access 21to the interior of a building for purposes of identifying the 22materials of construction of a service line. If a community 23water supply has been denied access on the property or to the 24interior of a building for that reason, then the community 25water supply shall attempt to identify the service line as a 26suspected lead service line, unless documentation is provided   HB3855- 7 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1showing otherwise.2    (j) If a community water supply identifies a lead service 3line connected to a building, the owner or operator of the 4community water supply shall attempt to notify the owner of 5the building and all occupants of the building of the 6existence of the lead service line within 15 days after 7identifying the lead service line, or as soon as is reasonably 8possible thereafter. Individual written notice shall be given 9according to the provisions of subsection (jj).10    (k) An owner or operator of a community water supply has no 11duty to include in the material inventory required under 12subsection (d) information about service lines that are 13physically disconnected from a water main in its distribution 14system.15    (l) The owner or operator of each community water supply 16shall post on its website a copy of the most recently submitted 17material inventory or alternatively may request that the 18Agency post a copy of that material inventory on the Agency's 19website.20    (m) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 21service lines to be unearthed for the sole purpose of 22inventorying.23    (n) When an owner or operator of a community water supply 24awards a contract under this Section, the owner or operator 25shall make a good faith effort to use contractors and vendors 26owned by minority persons, women, and persons with a   HB3855- 8 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1disability, as those terms are defined in Section 2 of the 2Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 3Disabilities Act, for not less than 20% of the total 4contracts, provided that:5        (1) contracts representing at least 11% of the total 6    projects shall be awarded to minority-owned businesses, as 7    defined in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for 8    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act;9        (2) contracts representing at least 7% of the total 10    projects shall be awarded to women-owned businesses, as 11    defined in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for 12    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act; and13        (3) contracts representing at least 2% of the total 14    projects shall be awarded to businesses owned by persons 15    with a disability.16    Owners or operators of a community water supply are 17encouraged to divide projects, whenever economically feasible, 18into contracts of smaller size that ensure small business 19contractors or vendors shall have the ability to qualify in 20the applicable bidding process, when determining the ability 21to deliver on a given contract based on scope and size, as a 22responsible and responsive bidder.23    When a contractor or vendor submits a bid or letter of 24intent in response to a request for proposal or other bid 25submission, the contractor or vendor shall include with its 26responsive documents a utilization plan that shall address how   HB3855- 9 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1compliance with applicable good faith requirements set forth 2in this subsection shall be addressed.3    Under this subsection, "good faith effort" means a 4community water supply has taken all necessary steps to comply 5with the goals of this subsection by complying with the 6following:7        (1) Soliciting through reasonable and available means 8    the interest of a business, as defined in Section 2 of the 9    Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 10    with Disabilities Act, that have the capability to perform 11    the work of the contract. The community water supply must 12    solicit this interest within sufficient time to allow 13    certified businesses to respond.14        (2) Providing interested certified businesses with 15    adequate information about the plans, specifications, and 16    requirements of the contract, including addenda, in a 17    timely manner to assist them in responding to the 18    solicitation.19        (3) Meeting in good faith with interested certified 20    businesses that have submitted bids.21        (4) Effectively using the services of the State, 22    minority or women community organizations, minority or 23    women contractor groups, local, State, and federal 24    minority or women business assistance offices, and other 25    organizations to provide assistance in the recruitment and 26    placement of certified businesses.  HB3855- 10 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (5) Making efforts to use appropriate forums for 2    purposes of advertising subcontracting opportunities 3    suitable for certified businesses.4    The diversity goals defined in this subsection can be met 5through direct award to diverse contractors and through the 6use of diverse subcontractors and diverse vendors to 7contracts. 8    (o) An owner or operator of a community water supply shall 9collect data necessary to ensure compliance with subsection 10(n) no less than semi-annually and shall include progress 11toward compliance of subsection (n) in the owner or operator's 12report required under subsection (t-5). The report must 13include data on vendor and employee diversity, including data 14on the owner's or operator's implementation of subsection (n).15    (p) Every owner or operator of a community water supply 16that has known or suspected lead service lines shall: 17        (1) create a plan to:18            (A) replace each lead service line connected to 19        its distribution system; and20            (B) replace each galvanized service line connected 21        to its distribution system, if the galvanized service 22        line is or was connected downstream to lead piping; 23        and24        (2) electronically submit, by April 15, 2024 its 25    initial lead service line replacement plan to the Agency;26        (3) electronically submit by April 15 of each year   HB3855- 11 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    after 2024 until April 15, 2027 an updated lead service 2    line replacement plan to the Agency for review; the 3    updated replacement plan shall account for changes in the 4    number of lead service lines or unknown service lines in 5    the material inventory described in subsection (d);6        (4) electronically submit by April 15, 2027 a complete 7    and final replacement plan to the Agency for approval; the 8    complete and final replacement plan shall account for all 9    known and suspected lead service lines documented in the 10    final material inventory described under paragraph (3) of 11    subsection (d); and12        (5) post on its website a copy of the plan most 13    recently submitted to the Agency or may request that the 14    Agency post a copy of that plan on the Agency's website. 15    (q) Each plan required under paragraph (1) of subsection 16(p) shall include the following: 17        (1) the name and identification number of the 18    community water supply;19        (2) the total number of service lines connected to the 20    distribution system of the community water supply;21        (3) the total number of suspected lead service lines 22    connected to the distribution system of the community 23    water supply;24        (4) the total number of known lead service lines 25    connected to the distribution system of the community 26    water supply;  HB3855- 12 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (5) the total number of lead service lines connected 2    to the distribution system of the community water supply 3    that have been replaced each year beginning in 2020;4        (6) a proposed lead service line replacement schedule 5    that includes one-year, 5-year, 10-year, 15-year, 20-year, 6    25-year, and 30-year goals;7        (7) an analysis of costs and financing options for 8    replacing the lead service lines connected to the 9    community water supply's distribution system, which shall 10    include, but shall not be limited to: 11            (A) a detailed accounting of costs associated with 12        replacing lead service lines and galvanized lines that 13        are or were connected downstream to lead piping;14            (B) measures to address affordability and prevent 15        service shut-offs for customers or ratepayers; and16            (C) consideration of different scenarios for 17        structuring payments between the utility and its 18        customers over time; and 19        (8) a plan for prioritizing high-risk facilities, such 20    as preschools, day care centers, day care homes, group day 21    care homes, parks, playgrounds, hospitals, and clinics, as 22    well as high-risk areas identified by the community water 23    supply;24        (9) a map of the areas where lead service lines are 25    expected to be found and the sequence with which those 26    areas will be inventoried and lead service lines replaced;  HB3855- 13 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (10) measures for how the community water supply will 2    inform the public of the plan and provide opportunity for 3    public comment; and4        (11) measures to encourage diversity in hiring in the 5    workforce required to implement the plan as identified 6    under subsection (n). 7    (r) The Agency shall review final plans submitted to it 8under subsection (p). The Agency shall approve a final plan if 9the final plan includes all of the elements set forth under 10subsection (q) and the Agency determines that:11        (1) the proposed lead service line replacement 12    schedule set forth in the plan aligns with the timeline 13    requirements set forth under subsection (v);14        (2) the plan prioritizes the replacement of lead 15    service lines that provide water service to high-risk 16    facilities, such as preschools, day care centers, day care 17    homes, group day care homes, parks, playgrounds, 18    hospitals, and clinics, and high-risk areas identified by 19    the community water supply;20        (3) the plan includes analysis of cost and financing 21    options; and22        (4) the plan provides documentation of public review. 23    (s) An owner or operator of a community water supply has no 24duty to include in the plans required under subsection (p) 25information about service lines that are physically 26disconnected from a water main in its distribution system.  HB3855- 14 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    (t) If a community water supply does not deliver a 2complete plan to the Agency by April 15, 2027, the community 3water supply may apply to the Agency for an extension no less 4than 3 months prior to the due date. The Agency shall develop 5criteria for granting plan extensions. When considering 6requests for extension, the Agency shall, at a minimum, 7consider: 8        (1) the number of service connections in a water 9    supply; and10        (2) the number of service lines of an unknown material 11    composition.12    (t-5) After the Agency has approved the final replacement 13plan described in subsection (p), the owner or operator of a 14community water supply shall submit a report detailing 15progress toward plan goals to the Agency for its review. The 16report shall be submitted annually for the first 10 years, and 17every 3 years thereafter until all lead service lines have 18been replaced. Reports under this subsection shall be 19published in the same manner described in subsection (l). The 20report shall include at least the following information as it 21pertains to the preceding reporting period:22        (1) The number of lead service lines replaced and the 23    average cost of lead service line replacement.24        (2) Progress toward meeting hiring requirements as 25    described in subsection (n) and subsection (o).26        (3) The percent of customers electing a waiver   HB3855- 15 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    offered, as described in subsections (ii) and (jj), among 2    those customers receiving a request or notification to 3    perform a lead service line replacement.4        (4) The method or methods used by the community water 5    supply to finance lead service line replacement.6    (u) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order 7to provide for costs associated with lead service line 8remediation and replacement, the corporate authorities of a 9municipality may, by ordinance or resolution by the corporate 10authorities, exercise authority provided in Section 27-5 et 11seq. of the Property Tax Code and Sections 8-3-1, 8-11-1, 128-11-5, 8-11-6, 9-1-1 et seq., 9-3-1 et seq., 9-4-1 et seq., 1311-131-1, and 11-150-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code. Taxes 14levied for this purpose shall be in addition to taxes for 15general purposes authorized under Section 8-3-1 of the 16Illinois Municipal Code and shall be included in the taxing 17district's aggregate extension for the purposes of Division 5 18of Article 18 of the Property Tax Code.19    (v) Every owner or operator of a community water supply 20shall replace all known lead service lines, subject to the 21requirements of subsection (ff), according to the following 22replacement rates and timelines to be calculated from the date 23of submission of the final replacement plan to the Agency: 24        (1) A community water supply reporting 1,200 or fewer 25    lead service lines in its final inventory and replacement 26    plan shall replace all lead service lines, at an annual   HB3855- 16 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    rate of no less than 7% of the amount described in the 2    final inventory, with a timeline of up to 15 years for 3    completion.4        (2) A community water supply reporting more than 1,200 5    but fewer than 5,000 lead service lines in its final 6    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 7    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 6% of the 8    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 9    of up to 17 years for completion.10        (3) A community water supply reporting more than 4,999 11    but fewer than 10,000 lead service lines in its final 12    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 13    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 5% of the 14    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 15    of up to 20 years for completion.16        (4) A community water supply reporting more than 9,999 17    but fewer than 99,999 lead service lines in its final 18    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 19    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 3% of the 20    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 21    of up to 34 years for completion.22        (5) A community water supply reporting more than 23    99,999 lead service lines in its final inventory and 24    replacement plan shall replace all lead service lines, at 25    an annual rate of no less than 2% of the amount described 26    in the final inventory, with a timeline of up to 35 50   HB3855- 17 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    years for completion.2    (w) A community water supply may apply to the Agency for an 3extension to the replacement timelines described in paragraphs 4(1) through (5) of subsection (v). The Agency shall develop 5criteria for granting replacement timeline extensions. When 6considering requests for timeline extensions, the Agency 7shall, at a minimum, consider: 8        (1) the number of service connections in a water 9    supply; and10        (2) unusual circumstances creating hardship for a 11    community.12    The Agency may grant one extension of additional time 13equal to not more than 20% of the original replacement 14timeline, except in situations of extreme hardship in which 15the Agency may consider a second additional extension equal to 16not more than 10% of the original replacement timeline.17    Replacement rates and timelines shall be calculated from 18the date of submission of the final plan to the Agency.19    (x) The Lead Service Line Replacement Advisory Board is 20created within the Agency. The Advisory Board shall convene 21within 120 days after January 1, 2022 (the effective date of 22Public Act 102-613). 23    The Advisory Board shall consist of at least 28 voting 24members, as follows:25        (1) the Director of the Agency, or his or her 26    designee, who shall serve as chairperson;  HB3855- 18 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (2) the Director of Revenue, or his or her designee;2        (3) the Director of Public Health, or his or her 3    designee;4        (4) fifteen members appointed by the Agency as 5    follows: 6            (A) one member representing a statewide 7        organization of municipalities as authorized by 8        Section 1-8-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code;9            (B) two members who are mayors representing 10        municipalities located in any county south of the 11        southernmost county represented by one of the 10 12        largest municipalities in Illinois by population, or 13        their respective designees;14            (C) two members who are representatives from 15        public health advocacy groups;16            (D) two members who are representatives from 17        publicly owned water utilities;18            (E) one member who is a representative from a 19        public utility as defined under Section 3-105 of the 20        Public Utilities Act that provides water service in 21        the State of Illinois;22            (F) one member who is a research professional 23        employed at an Illinois academic institution and 24        specializing in water infrastructure research;25            (G) two members who are representatives from 26        nonprofit civic organizations;  HB3855- 19 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1            (H) one member who is a representative from a 2        statewide organization representing environmental 3        organizations;4            (I) two members who are representatives from 5        organized labor; and6            (J) one member representing an environmental 7        justice organization; and 8        (5) ten members who are the mayors of the 10 largest 9    municipalities in Illinois by population, or their 10    respective designees. 11    No less than 10 of the 28 voting members shall be persons 12of color, and no less than 3 shall represent communities 13defined or self-identified as environmental justice 14communities.15    Advisory Board members shall serve without compensation, 16but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the 17performance of their duties from funds appropriated for that 18purpose. The Agency shall provide administrative support to 19the Advisory Board.20    The Advisory Board shall meet no less than once every 6 21months.22    (y) The Advisory Board shall have, at a minimum, the 23following duties:24        (1) advising the Agency on best practices in lead 25    service line replacement;26        (2) reviewing the progress of community water supplies   HB3855- 20 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    toward lead service line replacement goals;2        (3) advising the Agency on other matters related to 3    the administration of the provisions of this Section;4        (4) advising the Agency on the integration of existing 5    lead service line replacement plans with any statewide 6    plan; and7        (5) providing technical support and practical 8    expertise in general. 9    (z) Within 18 months after January 1, 2022 (the effective 10date of Public Act 102-613), the Advisory Board shall deliver 11a report of its recommendations to the Governor and the 12General Assembly concerning opportunities for dedicated, 13long-term revenue options for funding lead service line 14replacement. In submitting recommendations, the Advisory Board 15shall consider, at a minimum, the following: 16        (1) the sufficiency of various revenue sources to 17    adequately fund replacement of all lead service lines in 18    Illinois;19        (2) the financial burden, if any, on households 20    falling below 150% of the federal poverty limit;21        (3) revenue options that guarantee low-income 22    households are protected from rate increases;23        (4) an assessment of the ability of community water 24    supplies to assess and collect revenue;25        (5) variations in financial resources among individual 26    households within a service area; and  HB3855- 21 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        (6) the protection of low-income households from rate 2    increases. 3    (aa) Within 10 years after January 1, 2022 (the effective 4date of Public Act 102-613), the Advisory Board shall prepare 5and deliver a report to the Governor and General Assembly 6concerning the status of all lead service line replacement 7within the State.8    (bb) The Lead Service Line Replacement Fund is created as 9a special fund in the State treasury to be used by the Agency 10for the purposes provided under this Section. The Fund shall 11be used exclusively to finance and administer programs and 12activities specified under this Section and listed under this 13subsection.14    The objective of the Fund is to finance activities 15associated with identifying and replacing lead service lines, 16build Agency capacity to oversee the provisions of this 17Section, and provide related assistance for the activities 18listed under this subsection.19    The Agency shall be responsible for the administration of 20the Fund and shall allocate moneys on the basis of priorities 21established by the Agency through administrative rule. On July 221, 2022 and on July 1 of each year thereafter, the Agency shall 23determine the available amount of resources in the Fund that 24can be allocated to the activities identified under this 25Section and shall allocate the moneys accordingly.26    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Lead   HB3855- 22 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1Service Line Replacement Fund is not subject to sweeps, 2administrative charge-backs, or any other fiscal maneuver that 3would in any way transfer any amounts from the Lead Service 4Line Replacement Fund into any other fund of the State.5    (cc) Within one year after January 1, 2022 (the effective 6date of Public Act 102-613), the Agency shall design rules for 7a program for the purpose of administering lead service line 8replacement funds. The rules must, at minimum, contain:9        (1) the process by which community water supplies may 10    apply for funding; and11        (2) the criteria for determining unit of local 12    government eligibility and prioritization for funding, 13    including the prevalence of low-income households, as 14    measured by median household income, the prevalence of 15    lead service lines, and the prevalence of water samples 16    that demonstrate elevated levels of lead.17    (dd) Funding under subsection (cc) shall be available for 18costs directly attributable to the planning, design, or 19construction directly related to the replacement of lead 20service lines and restoration of property.21    Funding shall not be used for the general operating 22expenses of a municipality or community water supply. 23    (ee) An owner or operator of any community water supply 24receiving grant funding under subsection (cc) shall bear the 25entire expense of full lead service line replacement for all 26lead service lines in the scope of the grant.   HB3855- 23 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    (ff) When replacing a lead service line, the owner or 2operator of the community water supply shall replace the 3service line in its entirety, including, but not limited to, 4any portion of the service line (i) running on private 5property and (ii) within the building's plumbing at the first 6shut-off valve. Partial lead service line replacements are 7expressly prohibited. Exceptions shall be made under the 8following circumstances: 9        (1) In the event of an emergency repair that affects a 10    lead service line or a suspected lead service line, a 11    community water supply must contact the building owner to 12    begin the process of replacing the entire service line. If 13    the building owner is not able to be contacted or the 14    building owner or occupant refuses to grant access and 15    permission to replace the entire service line at the time 16    of the emergency repair, then the community water supply 17    may perform a partial lead service line replacement. Where 18    an emergency repair on a service line constructed of lead 19    or galvanized steel pipe results in a partial service line 20    replacement, the water supply responsible for commencing 21    the repair shall perform the following: 22            (A) Notify the building's owner or operator and 23        the resident or residents served by the lead service 24        line in writing that a repair has been completed. The 25        notification shall include, at a minimum:26                (i) a warning that the work may result in   HB3855- 24 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1            sediment, possibly containing lead, in the 2            building's water supply system;3                (ii) information concerning practices for 4            preventing the consumption of any lead in drinking 5            water, including a recommendation to flush water 6            distribution pipe during and after the completion 7            of the repair or replacement work and to clean 8            faucet aerator screens; and9                (iii) information regarding the dangers of 10            lead to young children and pregnant women. 11            (B) Provide filters for at least one fixture 12        supplying potable water for consumption. The filter 13        must be certified by an accredited third-party 14        certification body to NSF/ANSI 53 and NSF/ANSI 42 for 15        the reduction of lead and particulate. The filter must 16        be provided until such time that the remaining 17        portions of the service line have been replaced with a 18        material approved by the Department or a waiver has 19        been issued under subsection (ii).20            (C) Replace the remaining portion of the lead 21        service line within 30 days of the repair, or 120 days 22        in the event of weather or other circumstances beyond 23        reasonable control that prohibits construction. If a 24        complete lead service line replacement cannot be made 25        within the required period, the community water supply 26        responsible for commencing the repair shall notify the   HB3855- 25 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        Department in writing, at a minimum, of the following 2        within 24 hours of the repair: 3                (i) an explanation of why it is not feasible 4            to replace the remaining portion of the lead 5            service line within the allotted time; and6                (ii) a timeline for when the remaining portion 7            of the lead service line will be replaced. 8            (D) If complete repair of a lead service line 9        cannot be completed due to denial by the property 10        owner, the community water supply commencing the 11        repair shall request the affected property owner to 12        sign a waiver developed by the Department. If a 13        property owner of a nonresidential building or 14        residence operating as rental properties denies a 15        complete lead service line replacement, the property 16        owner shall be responsible for installing and 17        maintaining point-of-use filters certified by an 18        accredited third-party certification body to NSF/ANSI 19        53 and NSF/ANSI 42 for the reduction of lead and 20        particulate at all fixtures intended to supply water 21        for the purposes of drinking, food preparation, or 22        making baby formula. The filters shall continue to be 23        supplied by the property owner until such time that 24        the property owner has affected the remaining portions 25        of the lead service line to be replaced.26            (E) Document any remaining lead service line,   HB3855- 26 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1        including a portion on the private side of the 2        property, in the community water supply's distribution 3        system materials inventory required under subsection 4        (d). 5        For the purposes of this paragraph (1), written notice 6    shall be provided in the method and according to the 7    provisions of subsection (jj).8        (2) Lead service lines that are physically 9    disconnected from the distribution system are exempt from 10    this subsection. 11    (gg) Except as provided in subsection (hh), on and after 12January 1, 2022, when the owner or operator of a community 13water supply replaces a water main, the community water supply 14shall identify all lead service lines connected to the water 15main and shall replace the lead service lines by:16        (1) identifying the material or materials of each lead 17    service line connected to the water main, including, but 18    not limited to, any portion of the service line (i) 19    running on private property and (ii) within the building 20    plumbing at the first shut-off valve or 18 inches inside 21    the building, whichever is shorter;22        (2) in conjunction with replacement of the water main, 23    replacing any and all portions of each lead service line 24    connected to the water main that are composed of lead; and25        (3) if a property owner or customer refuses to grant 26    access to the property, following prescribed notice   HB3855- 27 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    provisions as outlined in subsection (ff). 2    If an owner of a potentially affected building intends to 3replace a portion of a lead service line or a galvanized 4service line and the galvanized service line is or was 5connected downstream to lead piping, then the owner of the 6potentially affected building shall provide the owner or 7operator of the community water supply with notice at least 45 8days before commencing the work. In the case of an emergency 9repair, the owner of the potentially affected building must 10provide filters for each kitchen area that are certified by an 11accredited third-party certification body to NSF/ANSI 53 and 12NSF/ANSI 42 for the reduction of lead and particulate. If the 13owner of the potentially affected building notifies the owner 14or operator of the community water supply that replacement of 15a portion of the lead service line after the emergency repair 16is completed, then the owner or operator of the community 17water supply shall replace the remainder of the lead service 18line within 30 days after completion of the emergency repair. 19A community water supply may take up to 120 days if necessary 20due to weather conditions. If a replacement takes longer than 2130 days, filters provided by the owner of the potentially 22affected building must be replaced in accordance with the 23manufacturer's recommendations. Partial lead service line 24replacements by the owners of potentially affected buildings 25are otherwise prohibited.26    (hh) For municipalities with a population in excess of   HB3855- 28 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b11,000,000 inhabitants, the requirements of subsection (gg) 2shall commence on January 1, 2023. 3    (ii) At least 45 days before conducting planned lead 4service line replacement, the owner or operator of a community 5water supply shall, by mail, attempt to contact the owner of 6the potentially affected building serviced by the lead service 7line to request access to the building and permission to 8replace the lead service line in accordance with the lead 9service line replacement plan. If the owner of the potentially 10affected building does not respond to the request within 15 11days after the request is sent, the owner or operator of the 12community water supply shall attempt to post the request on 13the entrance of the potentially affected building. 14    If the owner or operator of a community water supply is 15unable to obtain approval to access and replace a lead service 16line, the owner or operator of the community water supply 17shall request that the owner of the potentially affected 18building sign a waiver. The waiver shall be developed by the 19Department and should be made available in the owner's 20language. If the owner of the potentially affected building 21refuses to sign the waiver or fails to respond to the community 22water supply after the community water supply has complied 23with this subsection, then the community water supply shall 24notify the Department in writing within 15 working days. 25    (jj) When replacing a lead service line or repairing or 26replacing water mains with lead service lines or partial lead   HB3855- 29 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1service lines attached to them, the owner or operator of a 2community water supply shall provide the owner of each 3potentially affected building that is serviced by the affected 4lead service lines or partial lead service lines, as well as 5the occupants of those buildings, with an individual written 6notice. The notice shall be delivered by mail or posted at the 7primary entranceway of the building. The notice must, in 8addition, be electronically mailed where an electronic mailing 9address is known or can be reasonably obtained. Written notice 10shall include, at a minimum, the following: 11        (1) a warning that the work may result in sediment, 12    possibly containing lead from the service line, in the 13    building's water;14        (2) information concerning the best practices for 15    preventing exposure to or risk of consumption of lead in 16    drinking water, including a recommendation to flush water 17    lines during and after the completion of the repair or 18    replacement work and to clean faucet aerator screens; and19        (3) information regarding the dangers of lead exposure 20    to young children and pregnant women. 21    When the individual written notice described in the first 22paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 23planned work other than the repair or replacement of a water 24meter, the owner or operator of the community water supply 25shall provide the notice not less than 14 days before work 26begins. When the individual written notice described in the   HB3855- 30 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1first paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 2emergency repairs other than the repair or replacement of a 3water meter, the owner or operator of the community water 4supply shall provide the notice at the time the work is 5initiated. When the individual written notice described in the 6first paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 7the repair or replacement of a water meter, the owner or 8operator of the community water supply shall provide the 9notice at the time the work is initiated. 10    The notifications required under this subsection must 11contain the following statement in Spanish, Polish, Chinese, 12Tagalog, Arabic, Korean, German, Urdu, and Gujarati: "This 13notice contains important information about your water service 14and may affect your rights. We encourage you to have this 15notice translated in full into a language you understand and 16before you make any decisions that may be required under this 17notice."18    An owner or operator of a community water supply that is 19required under this subsection to provide an individual 20written notice to the owner and occupant of a potentially 21affected building that is a multi-dwelling building may 22satisfy that requirement and the requirements of this 23subsection regarding notification to non-English speaking 24customers by posting the required notice on the primary 25entranceway of the building and at the location where the 26occupant's mail is delivered as reasonably as possible.   HB3855- 31 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1    When this subsection would require the owner or operator 2of a community water supply to provide an individual written 3notice to the entire community served by the community water 4supply or would require the owner or operator of a community 5water supply to provide individual written notices as a result 6of emergency repairs or when the community water supply that 7is required to comply with this subsection is a small system, 8the owner or operator of the community water supply may 9provide the required notice through local media outlets, 10social media, or other similar means in lieu of providing the 11individual written notices otherwise required under this 12subsection. 13    No notifications are required under this subsection for 14work performed on water mains that are used to transmit 15treated water between community water supplies and properties 16that have no service connections. 17    (kk) No community water supply that sells water to any 18wholesale or retail consecutive community water supply may 19pass on any costs associated with compliance with this Section 20to consecutive systems.21    (ll) To the extent allowed by law, when a community water 22supply replaces or installs a lead service line in a public 23right-of-way or enters into an agreement with a private 24contractor for replacement or installation of a lead service 25line, the community water supply shall be held harmless for 26all damage to property when replacing or installing the lead   HB3855- 32 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1service line. If dangers are encountered that prevent the 2replacement of the lead service line, the community water 3supply shall notify the Department within 15 working days of 4why the replacement of the lead service line could not be 5accomplished.6    (mm) The Agency may propose to the Board, and the Board may 7adopt, any rules necessary to implement and administer this 8Section. The Department may adopt rules necessary to address 9lead service lines attached to non-community water supplies.10    (nn) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section, 11no requirement in this Section shall be construed as being 12less stringent than existing applicable federal requirements.13    (oo) All lead service line replacements financed in whole 14or in part with funds obtained under this Section shall be 15considered public works for purposes of the Prevailing Wage 16Act. 17    (pp) Beginning in 2023, each municipality with a 18population of more than 1,000,000 inhabitants shall publicly 19post on its website data describing progress the municipality 20has made toward replacing lead service lines within the 21municipality. The data required to be posted under this 22subsection shall be the same information required to be 23reported under paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (t-5) 24of this Section. Beginning in 2024, each municipality that is 25subject to this subsection shall annually update the data 26posted on its website under this subsection. A municipality's   HB3855- 33 -LRB104 11065 BDA 21147 b1duty to post data under this subsection terminates only when 2all lead service lines within the municipality have been 3replaced. Nothing in this subsection (pp) shall be construed 4to replace, undermine, conflict with, or otherwise amend the 5responsibilities and requirements set forth in subsection 6(t-5) of this Section. 7(Source: P.A. 102-613, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 8103-167, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)